Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2099.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 43.216.512 and 2025 c 412 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department shall adopt rules that allow the enrollment of children in the early childhood education and assistance program, as space is available, if the number of such children equals not more than 25 percent of total statewide enrollment, when the child is not eligible under RCW 43.216.505 and ((has)):(a) Has a family income level above 36 percent of the state median income but at or below 50 percent of the state median income adjusted for family size and the child meets at least one of the risk factor criterion described in subsection (2) of this section; or(b) Has a family income level above 36 percent of the state median income but at or below the maximum household income for working connections child care eligibility as established in RCW 43.216.802, adjusted for family size, and is from a household with a parent who is a military member.(2) Children enrolled in the early childhood education and assistance program pursuant to this section must be prioritized for available funded slots according to a prioritization system adopted in rule by the department that considers risk factors that have a disproportionate effect on kindergarten readiness and school performance, including:(a) Family income as a percent of the state median income;(b) Child welfare system involvement;(c) Domestic violence;(d) English as a second language;(e) Expulsion from an early learning setting;(f) A parent who is incarcerated;(g) A parent with a behavioral health treatment need; ((and))(h) A military member parent who is currently deployed, deployed within the last 12 months, or will be deployed within the current school year, or for a total of 19 or more months during the child's lifetime;(i) A military member parent who is a single custodial parent; and(j) Other risk factors determined by the department to be linked by research to school performance.(3) Children enrolled in the early childhood education and assistance program under this section are not considered eligible children as defined in RCW 43.216.505 and are not considered to be part of the state-funded entitlement required in RCW 43.216.556.(4) For purposes of this section, "military member" includes any of the following who are either stationed in or a resident of Washington state:(a) An active member of the United States armed forces;(b) A member of a military reserve component;(c) A member of the national guard;(d) A national oceanic and atmospheric administration commissioned corps member; or(e) A United States public health service commissioned corps member.(5) This section expires August 1, 2030.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.216 RCW under the subchapter heading "early childhood education and assistance" to read as follows:(1) The department shall adopt rules that allow the enrollment of children in the early childhood education and assistance program, as space is available and subject to appropriated funding, when the child:(a) Is not eligible under RCW 43.216.505;(b) Is from a household with a parent who is a military member; and(c) Has a family income level above 50 percent of the state median income but at or below the maximum household income for working connections child care eligibility as established in RCW 43.216.802, adjusted for family size.(2) Children enrolled in the early childhood education and assistance program pursuant to this section must be prioritized for available funded slots according to a prioritization system adopted in rule by the department that considers risk factors that have a disproportionate effect on kindergarten readiness and school performance, including:(a) Family income as a percent of the state median income;(b) Child welfare system involvement;(c) Domestic violence;(d) English as a second language;(e) Expulsion from an early learning setting;(f) A parent who is incarcerated;(g) A parent with a behavioral health treatment need;(h) A military member parent who is currently deployed, deployed within the last 12 months, or will be deployed within the current school year, or for a total of 19 or more months during the child's lifetime;(i) A military member parent who is a single custodial parent; and(j) Other risk factors determined by the department to be linked by research to school performance.(3) Children enrolled in the early childhood education and assistance program under this section are not considered eligible children as defined in RCW 43.216.505 and are not considered to be part of the state-funded entitlement required in RCW 43.216.556.(4) For purposes of this section, "military member" includes any of the following who are either stationed in or a resident of Washington state:(a) An active member of the United States armed forces;(b) A member of a military reserve component;(c) A member of the national guard;(d) A national oceanic and atmospheric administration commissioned corps member; or(e) A United States public health service commissioned corps member.Sec. 3. RCW 43.216.514 and 2021 c 199 s 507 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The department shall prioritize children for enrollment in the early childhood education and assistance program who are eligible pursuant to RCW 43.216.505.(b) A child who is eligible at the time of enrollment in the early childhood education and assistance program maintains program eligibility until the child begins kindergarten.(2) As space is available, children may be included in the early childhood education and assistance program pursuant to ((RCW 43.216.512))section 2 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. Sections 2 and 3 of this act take effect August 1, 2030.--- END ---